Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-214
Lender, defined.

Lender shall mean (1) any federally chartered or state-chartered bank, federal land bank, production credit association, bank for cooperatives, savings and loan association, building and loan association, or small business investment company, (2) the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Loan Fund, or (3) any other institution or fund qualified within the state to originate or service loans, including, but not limited to, insurance companies, credit unions, and mortgage loan companies.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 14;

Laws 1989, LB 311, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 18.